Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 67.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
81-5,153
Training Division
Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Training
Division Cash Fund is created. Money collected pursuant to section 81-5,152
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund
shall be used for the purpose of administering the training program established
pursuant to sections 81-5,151 to 81-5,157,
except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. The Training
Division Cash Fund shall be administered by the State Fire Marshal.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1980, LB 724, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-1431;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 88;

Laws 2004, LB 1091, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB322, § 25;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 67.
November 21, 2009
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.